test/src/morphology/N-М_А-критерий_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - критерий M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: крите́рий
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: крите́рий
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: крите́рия
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: крите́рии
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: крите́рию
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: крите́рием
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: крите́рии
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: крите́рии
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: крите́риев
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: крите́риях
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: крите́риям
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: крите́риями
